Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4921.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16613. (1) Notwithstanding section 16145 or section 16174(1)(c) or rules promulgated pursuant to either of those sections, the board may grant a license to engage in the practice of dentistry to an applicant applying for initial licensure who is a graduate of a dental education program that is located outside of the United States if the applicant meets the requirements of section 16174 and satisfies all of the following: (a) Provides verification that the dental education program that the applicant graduated from is substantially equivalent to the dental education programs in this state that are approved by the board. In determining whether an applicant has met the requirements described in this subdivision, the board shall accept a verification from an organization that is a member of the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services and any equivalent organization as determined by the board. (b) Has passed the requisite examination for licensure as a dentist, as approved by the board. (c) Any other requirement established by the department in consultation with the board. (2) Notwithstanding section 16145 or section 16174(1)(c) or rules promulgated pursuant to either of those sections, the board may grant a license to engage in the practice of dentistry to an applicant applying for licensure who is licensed or registered in another state and who is a graduate of a dental education program located outside of the United States if the applicant meets the requirements of subsection (1) and provides verification of licensure or registration in each state, country, jurisdiction, territory, and province in which the applicant is currently licensed or registered or has been licensed or registered. If the applicant seeking licensure under this subsection has, for at least 5 years immediately preceding the application, maintained an active license or registration in another state with no disciplinary sanctions, then the applicant does not have to provide the verification required under subsection (1)(a).